Indiana, session 2026, SB165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 15, 2026
(RETROACTIVE)] (a) This section applies only to an ordinance or
ordinances of the common council of the city of Hobart passed in
2023 authorizing the issuance of general obligation notes in one (1)
or more series to evidence a loan or loans from the state of Indiana
from the counter-cyclical revenue and economic stabilization fund
pursuant to IC 6-1.1-22.1 for the purpose of providing funds to be
applied to refunding certain bonds of the city of Hobart and the
city of Hobart redevelopment district and offsetting property tax
revenue shortfalls incurred and to be incurred by the city of
Hobart.
(b) Beginning on January 15, 2026:
(1) the loan or loans from the state of Indiana counter-cyclical
revenue and economic stabilization fund to the city of Hobart
described in subsection (a) are canceled; and
(2) the city of Hobart is not required to make any further
payments to the state of Indiana in satisfaction of the loan or
loans described in subsection (a).
2026 IN 165—LS 6717/DI 134


(c) This SECTION expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 165—LS 6717/DI 134